Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201852-1601
Master lien list; Secretary of State; compilation.

The Secretary of State shall compile lien information relative to liens created under Chapter 52, articles 2, 5, 7, 9, 11, 12, and 14, and Chapter 54, article 2, received by his or her office pursuant to subsection (a) of section 9-530, Uniform Commercial Code, into a master lien list in alphabetical order according to the last name of the individual against whom such lien is filed or, in the case of an entity doing business other than as an individual, the first word in the name of the debtor. Such master lien list shall contain the name and address of the debtor, the name and address of the lienholder, and the type of such lien.

Laws 1988, LB 987, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 550, § 34;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 24;

Laws 2016, LB1035, § 4.